Hawaii statutes.
§431:10D-622 Definitions. For the
purposes of this part:

"Annuity" means an annuity that is an
insurance product under state law that is individually solicited, whether the
product is classified as an individual or group annuity.

"Approved continuing education course
provider" means an individual or entity that is approved to offer
continuing education courses pursuant to article 9A.

"Continuing education credit" means
one continuing education credit hour. For the purposes of this paragraph,
"credit hour" has the same meaning as set forth in section
431:9A-102.

"Insurance producer" means a person
required to be licensed under the laws of this State to sell, solicit, or
negotiate insurance, including annuities.

"Insurer" means a company required to
be licensed under the laws of this State to provide insurance products,
including annuities.

"Recommendation" means advice
provided by an insurance producer, or an insurer where no producer is involved,
to an individual consumer that results in a purchase, exchange, or replacement
of an annuity in accordance with that advice.

"Replacement" means a transaction for
the purchase of a new policy or contract that the proposing producer, or the
proposing insurer if there is no producer, knows or has reason to know will
cause an existing policy or contract to be:

(1) Terminated, lapsed, forfeited, or surrendered,
partially surrendered, or assigned to the replacing insurer;

(2) Converted to reduced paid-up insurance, continued
as extended term insurance, or otherwise reduced in value by the use of
nonforfeiture benefits or other policy values;

(3) Amended to effect a reduction in either benefits
or the term for which coverage would otherwise remain in force or for which
benefits would be paid;

(4) Reissued with any reduction in cash value; or

(5) Used in a finance purchase.

"Suitability information" means
information about the consumer that is reasonably related to the determination
of the appropriateness of a recommendation, including the following:

(1) Age;

(2) Annual income;

(3) Financial situation and needs, including the
financial resources used for funding the annuity at issue;

(4) Financial experience;

(5) Financial objectives;

(6) Intended use of the annuity;

(7) Financial time horizon;

(8) Existing assets, including investment and life
insurance holdings;

(9) Liquidity needs;

(10) Liquid net worth;

(11) Risk tolerance; and

(12) Tax status. [L 2007, c 257, pt of §2; am L 2011,
c 108, §4; am L 2012, c 66, §13]

Note

Definitions of "approved continuing education course
provider" and "continuing education credit" take effect
retroactive to January 1, 2012. L 2012, c 66, §17.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next